Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-617
Receiving an altered article; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of receiving an altered article if, with the intent to deceive or harm another, he buys or receives any article knowing that an identification number thereon is obscured, without first ascertaining that the person so selling or delivering the same has a legal right to do so.

(2) Receiving an altered article is a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 139.